Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-127
List of stockholders; open to inspection; violation; penalty.

(1) Every bank shall cause to be kept at all times a full and correct list of the names and residences of all its stockholders, the number of shares held by each, and the amount of paid-up capital represented thereby. Such list shall be subject to the inspection of all stockholders of the bank during all business hours, and shall be kept in the business office where all stockholders may have ready access to it.

(2) Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 38, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 317;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 38, p. 701;

C.S.1922, § 8018;

C.S.1929, § 8-157;

R.S.1943, § 8-162;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 27, p. 145;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 42;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 27.
August 24, 2017